Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB697.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 205(b) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 amended to read:Section 205. Pennsylvania State Police.--* * *(b) The Pennsylvania State Police shall consist of such number of officers and enlisted members, and shall be organized in such manner, as the Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police, with the approval of the Governor, shall from time to time determine[: Provided, however, That the number of officers and enlisted members shall not exceed in the aggregate at any time four thousand three hundred ten persons. State police officers and enlisted members, assigned to duty with the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, Delaware River Joint Toll Bridge Commission, Gaming Enforcement and Liquor Control Enforcement shall not be counted in determining the total number of officers and enlisted members in the Pennsylvania State Police].* * *SECTION 1.1. REPEALS ARE AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 205(B) OF THE ACT.(2) SECTION 1733-E(3) OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS THE FISCAL CODE, IS REPEALED.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0697PN0989 - 2 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223